New Jersey, session 221, A3839.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Department of Community Affairs shall establish a program for the collection of information about residents of the State seeking affordable housing in the State. b.    (1)   The department shall post information about the program and solicit the submission of forms from State residents on the Internet website of the department. (2)   The department shall prescribe the forms to be used by State residents for the purposes of the program, which forms shall, at a minimum, require residents to provide the following information: (a)   the current municipality of residence; (b)   the current municipality of employment, if any; and (c)   the municipality in which affordable housing is desired. (3)   The department shall make the forms available on the Internet website of the department and shall furnish copies of the form upon request. c.     The department shall retrieve the information as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section, to the fullest extent possible based upon availability, from State and local government agencies, including municipalities and housing authorities, that receive applications for affordable housing. d.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall, by January 31 of each year, prepare a report compiling all the information collected in the prior year under the program, categorized by municipality for which affordable housing is desired, and shall provide a copy of the report to the Council on Affordable Housing, or its successor, to help the council ascertain the demand for affordable housing that currently exists in each municipality in the State. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment.